en: flake sea salt, sea salt flakes
de: Meersalzflocken, Meersalz-Flocken
fr: flocons de sel marin
hr: pahuljice morske soli
it: fiocchi di sale marino
sv: flinghavssalt, havssaltflingor, flingor av havssalt, flingsalt från havet

en: sodium iodide
ar: يوديد الصوديوم
bg: натриев йодид
bs: Natrijum jodid
ca: iodur de sodi
cs: Jodid sodný
de: Natriumiodid
el: Ιωδιούχο νάτριο
eo: natria jodido
es: Yoduro de sodio
fa: سدیم یدید
fi: Natriumjodidi
fr: iodure de sodium
hi: सोडियम आयोडाइड
hr: natrijev jodid
hu: Nátrium-jodid
id: Natrium iodida
it: Ioduro di sodio
ja: ヨウ化ナトリウム
ko: 아이오딘화 나트륨
ky: Натрий иодиди
nl: Natriumjodide
nn: natriumjodid
pl: Jodek sodu
pt: iodeto de sódio
ro: Iodură de sodiu
ru: иодид натрия
sh: Natrijum jodid
sk: Jodid sodný
sr: натријум јодид
sv: Natriumjodid
ta: சோடியம் அயோடைடு
th: โซเดียมไอโอไดด์
uk: Йодид натрію
vi: Natri iođua
zh: 碘化钠

en: potassium iodide
de: Kaliumiodid
hr: kalijev jodid

en: non-iodised salt
de: salz unjodiert, Speisesalz unjodiert
fr: sel non iodé
hr: nejodirana sol
pl: sól niejodowana
sl: nejodirana sol

en: non-iodised sea salt
fr: sel de mer non iodé
hr: nejodirana morska sol, nejodin morksa sol

en: finegrained non-iodized sea salt
hr: sitna morska sol nejodirana

en: iodised salt, iodized salt
ar: ملح معالج باليود
bg: йодирана сол, сол йодирана
ca: sal iodada
cs: Jodidovaná sůl, jodizovaná sůl, sůl jodizovaná
da: joderet salt, salt tilsat jod
de: Jodsalz, Iodsalz, jodiertes Speisesalz, Salz jodiert
es: Sal yodada
fa: نمک یددار
fi: jodioitu suola, jodia sisältävä suola, jodisuola
fr: Sel iodé, sel de cuisine iodé
hr: jodirana sol, jodirona kuhinjska sol, kuhinjska sol jodirana, jodirana kuhinjska sol
hu: jódozott só
id: Garam beryodium
it: Sale iodato, sale fino iodato protetto
lt: Joduota druska
lv: jodētais sāls
nb: jodisert salt, salt med jod
nl: gejodeerd zout
pl: sól jodowana
pt: Sal iodado
ro: sare iodată, sare iodata
ru: Йодированная поваренная соль, соль йодированная
sl: jodirana sol
sv: joderat salt, joderad salt, jodsalt, salt med jod, jodiserat salt
th: เกลือเสริมไอโอดีน, เกลือบริโภคเสริมไอโอดีน
uk: Йодована сіль
vi: Muối iốt
zh: 碘盐

en: curing salt, curing salts
ar: ملح معالج
de: pökelsalz
hr: sol za liječenje
it: sale per salatura
pl: sól peklowa, sól peklująca
ru: нитритно-посолочная смесь, посолочная смесь

en: nitrite curing salt, nitrite salt
bg: нитритна сол
da: nitritsalt
de: Nitritpökelsalz
fi: nitriittisuola
fr: Sel de nitrite
hr: nitritna sol
it: sale nitritato
nl: nitrietpekelzout
pl: sól peklowa azotynowa, sól peklująca azotynowa
sv: nitritsalt

en: iodised sea salt, iodized sea salt
bg: йодирана морска сол
ca: sal marina iodada, sal de mar iodada
da: iodiseret havsalt
de: jodiertes Meersalz
es: sal marina yodada, sal de mar yodada
fi: jodioitu merisuola
fr: sel marin iodé
hr: morska sol jodirana, jodirana morska sol, sitna jodirana morska sol, krupna jodirana morska sol
hu: jódozott tengeri só
it: sale marino iodato
pl: sól morska jodowana, jodowana sól morska
sl: jodirana morska sol
sv: joderat havssalt, joderad havssalt

en: Garlic salt
bg: чеснова сол
ca: sal d'all
de: Knoblauchsalz
es: sal de ajo
fr: Sel à l'ail, sel d'ail
hr: češnjak sol
it: sale all'aglio
pl: sól czosnkowa

en: Celery salt
ca: sal d'api
de: Selleriesalz
es: sal de apio
fr: Sel de céleri, sel au céleri
hr: sol celera
it: sale di sedano
pl: sól selerowa

en: potassium salt, potassium chloride
bg: калиева сол
ca: sal mineral de potassi
es: sal mineral de potasio
hr: kalijeva sol
nl: kaliumzout, kaliumchloride
pl: sól potasowa, mineralna sól potasowa

en: processed salt
de: verarbeitetes Salz
hr: prerađena sol
it: sale lavorato

en: animal
bg: животно
ca: Animal
cs: Živočišný
da: dyr
de: tierisch
es: animal
fi: eläin
fr: Animal
hr: životinja
hu: állati, állati eredetű
it: Animale
ja: 動物
lv: dzīvnieks
nb: dyr
nl: dier
pl: Zwierzę, zwierzęta, zwierzęcy, zwierzęca, zwierzęce
pt: Animal
sv: djur

en: meat
bg: месо
bs: meso
ca: Carn
cs: Maso
da: Kød
de: Fleisch
es: carne
fi: liha
fr: viande
he: בשר
hr: meso
hu: hús
it: carne
ja: 肉
lv: gaļa
nb: kjøtt
nl: vlees
pl: Mięso, mięsa, mięs
pt: Carne
ro: Carne
ru: Мясо
sv: Kött
tr: et
uk: М'ясо
zh: 肉

en: meat preparation
de: Fleischzubereitung
fi: lihavalmiste
fr: préparation de viande
hr: priprema mesa
it: preparazione della carne
nl: vleesbereiding

en: dried beef preparation
es: preparación de carne de res seca
fr: préparation de viande de boeuf séchée
hr: pripravak sušenog goveđeg mesa
it: preparazione di carne di manzo essiccata

en: mechanically separated meat
cs: strojně oddělené maso
da: maskinsepareret kød
de: Separatorenfleisch, mechanisch separiertes Fleisch
el: μηχανικά διαχωρισμένο κρέας
es: carne separada mecánicamente
et: mehaaniliselt eraldatud liha
fi: mekaanisesti erotettu liha
fr: viande séparée mécaniquement, viandes séparées mécaniquement
hr: mehanički otkošeno meso
hu: gépi úton szétválasztott hús
it: carne separata meccanicamente
lt: mechaniškai atskirta mėsa
lv: mehāniski atdalīta gaļa
nl: machinaal gescheiden vlees, separatorvlees
pl: mięso oddzielone mechanicznie, MOM
pt: carne separada mecanicamente
ro: carne separată mecanic
sk: strojovo oddelené mäso
sl: mehansko ločeno meso
sv: maskinurbenat kött

fi: kokolihavalmiste
sv: helköttsprodukt